Washington statutes.
RCW 15.74.005

Legislative purpose.

The legislature recognizes that the economic base of the state of Washington is directly tied to the development and management of forest industries and that efforts to enhance and promote the recognition and expansion of the hardwoods industry should be coordinated between state and federal agencies, the forest products industry, commissions, institutions of higher education, and other entities. The legislature further recognizes that the development of hardwood forests and hardwood products will require multispecie, sustained-yield management plans for industrial and nonindustrial timber tracts, the development of products and markets for all grades of hardwoods, a stable and predictable tax program for new and existing firms and financial assistance for the attraction and expansion of new and existing hardwood processing facilities. The legislature also recognizes that the welfare of the citizens of the state of Washington require, as a public purpose, a continuing effort toward the full utilization of hardwood forests and the hardwood products industry.

[ 1990 c 142 s 1.]